test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosj_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - хось: # Verb 'to find' - partial paradigm - Type 1, transitive
  
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ходмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хон
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хо
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хониʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ходиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ховаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ходаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хоˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хов
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хор
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хода
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хомиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хориʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: ходиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хораˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: ходоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хоян
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хояд
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хойда
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хойниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хойдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хойдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хойнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хойдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хойдоʼ     
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ходамзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хонась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хось
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хонинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ходинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хоӈаханзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ховаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ходаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хоць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хорась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: ходась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хоминзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хоринзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: ходинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хораць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: ходонзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюнась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоӈахаюнаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хойнась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хойдась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хойдась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хойнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хойдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хойдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хойнаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хойдаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хойдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: хохов
#     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: [хохов, хохув]
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: хохохоюн
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: хохон
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: ход
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: хохоюнˮ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: хонˮ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: хомда
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдамда
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: хойдамда
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: хохомиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: хохохоюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: хохониʼ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: хориʼ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: хойдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: хомдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдамдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: хойдамдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: хоховаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: хохохоюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: хохонаˮ  
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: хораˮ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: хойдаˮ 
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: хомдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоӈахаюдамдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: хойдамдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: хоидмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: хоин
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: хои
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: хоиниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: хоидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: хоихиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: хоиваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: хоидаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: хоиˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хоив
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хоир
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хоида
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хоимиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хоириʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хоидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хоиваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хоираˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хоидоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоихиюн
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоихиюд
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоихиюда
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоихиюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоихиюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоихиюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоихиюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоихиюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоихиюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хоин
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хоид
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хоида
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хоиниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хоидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хоидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хоинаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хоидаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хоидоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: хоидамзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: хоинась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: хоись
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: хоининзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: хоидинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: хоихинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: хоиваць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: хоидаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: хоиць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хоивась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хоирась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хоидась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хоиминзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хоиринзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хоидинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хоиваць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хоираць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хоидонзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоихиюнась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоихиюдась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоихиюдась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоихиюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоихиюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоихиюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоихиюнаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоихиюдаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоихиюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хоинась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хоидась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хоидась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хоининзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хоидинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хоидинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хоинаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хоидаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хоидонзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: хобцудмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: хобцун
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: хобцу
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: хобцуниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: хобцудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: хобцухуʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: хобцуваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: хобцудаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: хобцуˮ     
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcSg3: хобцув
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcSg3: хобцур
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcSg3: хобцуда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcSg3: хобцумиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcSg3: хобцуриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcSg3: хобцудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcSg3: хобцуваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcSg3: хобцураˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcSg3: хобцудоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcDu3: хобцухуюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcDu3: хобцухуюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcDu3: хобцухуюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcDu3: хобцухуюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcDu3: хобцухуюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcDu3: хобцухуюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcDu3: хобцухуюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcDu3: хобцухуюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcDu3: хобцухуюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcPl3: хобцун
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcPl3: хобцуд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcPl3: хобцуда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcPl3: хобцуниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcPl3: хобцудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcPl3: хобцудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcPl3: хобцунаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcPl3: хобцудаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcPl3: хобцудоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1: хосадмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2: хосан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3: хоса
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1: хосаниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2: хосадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3: хосахаʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1: хосаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2: хосадаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3: хосаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcSg3: хосав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcSg3: хосар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcSg3: хосада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcSg3: хосамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcSg3: хосариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcSg3: хосадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcSg3: хосаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcSg3: хосараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcSg3: хосадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcDu3: хосахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcDu3: хосахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcDu3: хосахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcDu3: хосахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcDu3: хосахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcDu3: хосахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcDu3: хосахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcDu3: хосахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcDu3: хосахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcPl3: хосян
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcPl3: хосяд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcPl3: хосьда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcPl3: хосьниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcPl3: хосьдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcPl3: хосьдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcPl3: хосьнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcPl3: хосьдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcPl3: хосьдоʼ    
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: ховэдмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: ховэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: ховы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: ховэниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: ховэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: ховэхэʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: ховэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: ховэдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: ховыˮ  
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховэв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховэр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховэда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховэмиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховэриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховэраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховэдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховэхэюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховэхэюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховэхэюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховэхэюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховэхэюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховын
